Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB43.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6102 of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a definition to read:§ 6102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this subchapter which are applicable to specific provisions of this subchapter, the following words and phrases, when used in this subchapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"Frame or receiver." Any of the following:(1) A part of a firearm which provides housing for components, including the hammer, bolt or breechblock, firing 123456789101112131415161718 pin, ejector or extractor.(2) A partially manufactured blank, casting or machined body intended, designed or advertised for the purpose of being turned into a fully operable part of a firearm which provides housing for components, including the hammer, bolt or breechblock, firing pin, ejector or extractor.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0043PN0016 - 2 - 12345678